public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
kapir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
sernir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0,0
ŧernir/a0a1c0c1E0E1-0,0
sarnir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0,0
fenir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0s0s1-0*0,0
kostruir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2s0s1.0
instruir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2s0s1
ostruir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2+0
fuđir/a0a1c0c1E0E1.0
fuxir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2.0
ferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
farir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
proferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
profarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
spreferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
sprefarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
trasfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
ŧernir/a0a1c0c1E0E1-0,0
sernir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0,0
sarnir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0,0
vartir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0@0:0
divartir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
stabilir/a0a1c0c1E0E1.0
stabiƚir/a0a2c0c2E0E2.0
kovrir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2+0
sarvir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2@0,0
bensarvir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
adenpir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
konpir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
farir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
proferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
profarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
spreferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
sprefarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
trasferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
trasfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
inpedir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0s0s1
spedir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
vartir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0@0:0
divartir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
parvartir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
falir/a0a1c0c1E0E1r0
faƚir/a0a2c0c2E0E2
fornir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0+0.0
inpenir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
destituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
kostituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2s0s1
konstituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2s0s1
istituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
instituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
restituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
sostituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2s0s1
substituir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
unir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
ingrasianir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
ingraŧianir/a0a1c0c1E0E1
unir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2.0
ferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
farir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
proferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
profarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2-0
spreferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
sprefarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
transfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
trasfarir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
kolpir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2*0
